Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3718
Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund; created; termination.

The Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund is created. The fund terminates on July 1, 2026, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to the General Fund. This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 2011, LB463, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB952, § 6.
July 1, 2026